test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_ruottad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - ruottâđ: # MLO, checked
    ruottâđ+V+Inf: ruottâđ
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâm
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ruotah
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáttá
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ryetteen
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ruottâvettee
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ruottâv
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ruottâp
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ruottâvetteđ
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ryettih
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruottim
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ruottih
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ruotâi
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ruotáim
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ruotáid
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ruotáin
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ruotâim
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ruotâid
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ruottii
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ruotâččim
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: ruotâččih
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ruotâččij
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: ruotâččáim
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: ruotâččáid
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: ruotâččáin
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: ruotâččijm
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: ruotâččijd
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: ruotâččii
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ryetteem
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: ryetteeh
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: ruotâš
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: ruotâžeen
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: ruotâšvettee
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: ruotâžává
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: ruotâžep
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: ruotâšvetteđ
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: ruotâžeh
    ruottâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ruotâ
    ruottâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: ruáttus
    ruottâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ruáttoon
    ruottâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: ryettee
    ruottâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: ruáttus
    ruottâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: ruáttup
    ruottâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ruottâđ
    ruottâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: ruáttus
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ruotâ
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ruottâm
    ruottâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: ruotâččii
    ruottâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: ruottii
    ruottâđ+V+PrsPrc: ryettee
    ruottâđ+V+PrfPrc: ruottâm
    ruottâđ+V+Actio+Nom: ruottâm
    ruottâđ+V+Actio+Ess: ruottâmin
    ruottâđ+V+Actio+Loc: ruottâmist
    ruottâđ+V+Actio+Ill: ruottâmân
    ruottâđ+V+Actio+Com: ruotâdijn
    ruottâđ+V+VAbess: ruotâhánnáá
